Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2535
City clerk; illegal acts; penalty.

Any city clerk who willfully refuses to comply with the provisions of sections 18-2501 to 18-2531 and 18-2538 or who willfully causes unreasonable delay in the execution of his or her duties under such sections shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor, but imprisonment shall not be included as part of the punishment.

Laws 1982, LB 807, § 35;

Laws 1984, LB 1010, § 21.